Utah statutes.
78B-13-307.   Simultaneous proceedings.

If a proceeding for enforcement under this part has been or is commenced in this state and a court of this state determines that a proceeding to modify the determination has been commenced in another state having jurisdiction to modify the determination under Part 2, Jurisdiction, the enforcing court shall immediately communicate with the modifying court.  The proceeding for enforcement continues unless the enforcing court, after consultation with the modifying court, stays or dismisses the proceeding.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

